Hawaii statutes.
§431:10G-103 Motorcycle or motor scooter
self-insurance. The motorcycle or motor scooter insurance required by
section 431:10G-102 may be satisfied by any owner of a motorcycle or motor
scooter if:

(1) Such owner provides proof of qualifications as a
self-insurer, and a surety bond or other securities affording security
substantially equivalent to that afforded under a policy meeting the
requirements of section 431:10G-301 and providing coverage at all times for the
entire motorcycle or motor scooter registration period, as determined and
approved by the commissioner under rules; and

(2) The commissioner is satisfied that in case of
injury, death, or property damage, any claimant would have the same rights
against such owner as the claimant would have had if a policy meeting the
requirements of section 431:10G-301 had been applicable to such motorcycle or
motor scooter. [L 1989, c 208, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next